Louisiana, session 2026, SB390.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 45:1207 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1207. Digital mapping for public and private utility companies
A.(1) The Louisiana Public Service Commission shall secure information
from any entity, public or private, providing public utilities, including
electricity, water, natural gas, and wastewater, to at least one location in the
state to assist the office in compiling a statewide parish-by-parish map, in digital
form, identifying the locations of utility systems in the state of Louisiana.
B. The cost of mapping and locating utilities shall be assessed to the
owners of the utility systems, whether public or private.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-436 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 390
C. The Louisiana Public Service Commission may promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this Section in accordance
with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.
D. The Louisiana Public Service Commission may create a grant
program and promulgate rules necessary to prevent damage to existing utilities
and ensure proper documentation of utilities associated with the grant program.
After review by the House Committee on Commerce and the Senate Committee
on Commerce, Consumer Protection and International Affairs, the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget shall review and approve the rules and
regulations before implementation.
E. The requirements of this Section shall be completed by December 31,
2032. The statewide parish-by-parish map, in digital form, shall have an
accuracy rating of a minimum of eighty-five percent.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.